Utah statutes.
26-4-18.   Records of medical examiner -- Admissibility as evidence -- Subpoena of person who prepared record.

The records of the medical examiner or transcripts thereof certified by the medical examiner are admissible as evidence in any civil action in any court in this state except that statements by witnesses or other persons, unless taken pursuant to Section 26-4-21, as conclusions upon extraneous matters are not hereby made admissible. The person who prepared a report or record offered in evidence hereunder may be subpoenaed as a witness in the case by any party.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

